Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4502
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act is to provide support for former state or tribal wards, and for other youth who are exiting state care, who are disconnected from family support, and who are at risk of homelessness, as they transition to adulthood, become self-sufficient, and create permanent relationships. The bridge to independence program shall at all times recognize and respect the autonomy of the young adult. Nothing in the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act shall be construed to abrogate any other rights that a person who has attained eighteen or nineteen years of age may have as an adult under state or tribal law.

Laws 2013, LB216, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 31;

Laws 2020, LB848, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 25.